Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-1214] Proceeds. Except as
otherwise provided in section 103D-1213 or by any other law, all moneys
received from the sale of any state property by any office, department, board,
establishment, institution, or other agency shall be deposited with the
director of finance to the credit of the general fund where the operation of
the agency is financed from the general fund; provided that where any state
property has been purchased with moneys in a special fund, the proceeds of the
sale shall be paid into or credited to the special fund. In any case of doubt
as to the application of any such proceeds, the administrator of the state
procurement office shall determine the fund or appropriation to which the
proceeds shall be credited pursuant to this section, and the administrator's
decision shall be final. [L 1994, c 186, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next